Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Mississippi Gulf Coast Regional Wastewater Authority
[Repealed]

§§ 49-17-301 through 49-17-353.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2006, ch. 546, § 40, effective July 1, 2007.

§49-17-301. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-303. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).]

§49-17-305. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-307. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-309. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 378, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).]

§49-17-311. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 6; Laws, 1982, ch. 378, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1982).]

§49-17-313. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-315. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-317. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-319. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-321. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-323. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-325. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 13; Laws, 1982, chs. 378, § 4; 434, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1982).]

§49-17-327. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-329. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-331. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-333. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-335. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-337. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-339. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-341. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-343. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-345. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-347. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-349. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-351. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]

§49-17-353. [Laws, 1980, ch. 521, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1980).]